Hawaii statutes.
§804-32 Bond pending trial and upon appeal.
When anyone arrested under section 804-31 is brought before the district judge,
and a continuance of the trial upon the charge is granted, the district judge
shall direct the accused to give a combined appearance and temporary peace bond
in a sum proportioned to the nature of the offense, with sufficient surety that
the accused will commit no offense against the person or property of the
complainant during the period of time the trial is continued, and the peace
bond shall remain in effect upon appeal by the accused after a finding of guilt
at the trial or during any appeal after a finding of guilt. [L 1919, c 7, §1;
RL 1925, §3997; RL 1935, §5451; RL 1945, §10751; am L 1953, c 128, §1; RL 1955,
§256-31; HRS §709-32; am L 1970, c 188, §39; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch
1985]

Case Notes

Sureties. 30 H. 658 (1928).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next